Hawaii statutes.
[§663E-1] Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Illegal drug" means "dangerous
drugs" or a "harmful drug" as defined in section 712-1240.

"Illegal drug market" means the
support system of illegal drug-related operations, from production to retail
sales, through which an illegal drug reaches the user.

"Illegal drug market target
community" is the area described under section 663E-5.

"Individual drug user" means the
individual whose illegal drug use is the basis of an action brought under this
chapter.

"Level four offense" means the
illegal possession of sixteen ounces or more or the illegal distribution of
four ounces or more of an illegal drug.

"Level one offense" means the illegal
possession of one-fourth ounce or more, but less than four ounces, or the
illegal distribution of less than one ounce of an illegal drug.

"Level three offense" means the
illegal possession of eight ounces or more, but less than sixteen ounces, or
the illegal distribution of two ounces or more, but less than four ounces, of
an illegal drug.

"Level two offense" means the illegal
possession of four ounces or more, but less than eight ounces, or the illegal
distribution of one ounce or more, but less than two ounces, of an illegal
drug.

"Participate in the illegal drug market"
means to illegally:

(1) Distribute an illegal drug;

(2) Possess with an intent to distribute;

(3) Commit an act intended to facilitate the
marketing or distribution of an illegal drug;

(4) Commit any of the marketing or distribution of an
illegal drug; or

(5) Conspire to commit any of the foregoing acts.

"Period of illegal drug use" means,
in relation to the individual drug user, the entire time of the individual's
illegal use of an illegal drug. In cases where the testimony of the individual
drug user is unavailable, the period of illegal drug use is presumed to
commence two years before the earliest known use by the individual drug user,
unless the defendant proves otherwise by clear and convincing evidence.

"Place of illegal drug activity" means,
in relation to the individual drug user, the place in which the individual
possesses or uses an illegal drug or in which the individual resides, attends
school, or is employed during the period of the individual's illegal drug use.

"Place of participation" means, in
relation to a defendant in an action brought under this chapter, the place at
which the person participates in the illegal drug market or at which the person
resides, attends school, or is employed during the period of the person's
participation in the illegal drug market. [L 2004, c 44, pt of §13]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next